Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.280

Transfer students' eligibility for extracurricular activities.

Eligibility of transfer students under RCW 28A.225.220 and 28A.225.225 for participation in extracurricular activities shall be subject to rules adopted by the Washington interscholastic activities association.

[ 2006 c 263 s 903; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 206.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Captions, headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.225.225.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.